Utah statutes.
63G-2-106.   Records of security measures.

The records of a governmental entity or political subdivision regarding security measures designed for the protection of persons or property, public or private, are not subject to this chapter.  These records include:

(1)  security plans;

(2)  security codes and combinations, and passwords;

(3)  passes and keys;

(4)  security procedures; and

(5)  building and public works designs, to the extent that the records or information relate to the ongoing security measures of a public entity.

